Missouri, session 2026, HB1758.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.355, to read as follows:
1.355. 1. There is hereby established the "Daylight Saving as New Standard
Time Pact" consisting of this state and any other state desiring to permanently change
daylight saving time to a new standard time.
2. The state of Missouri hereby exempts all areas of the state from the daylight
saving time provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 260a, as amended.
3. On the effective date of this section, Missouri will switch clocks to daylight
saving time for the last time and daylight saving time will be eliminated. The time
formerly known as daylight saving time will become standard time. After this time,
Missouri will no longer observe daylight saving time.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 2 and 3 of this section to the
contrary, if the federal government adopts daylight saving time as the new standard
time, the state of Missouri shall set clocks to conform with the new standard time.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.